Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 10 Preliminary Proceedings in District Courts

12-10-1.
Court open at all times.

The district court shall be open at all times for the transaction of criminal business.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 149; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19.

12-10-2.
Powers of justices of the peace.

The chief judge of the district court shall, from time to time, appoint, with power to revoke the appointments, from those qualified justices of the peace who shall be members of the bar of the state of Rhode Island within the cities and towns and divisions of the district court, as many justices of the peace as he or she may deem necessary, who shall be authorized to set and take bail in all complaints bailable before a division of the district court, except those offenses punishable by life imprisonment and, in default of bail, to commit to the adult correctional institutions all respondents arrested on those complaints. The chief judge shall authorize the justices of the peace, so appointed by him or her, to issue warrants and complaints returnable to the division of the district court for any offense for which, by law, a judge of the district court may issue a warrant and complaint, and all warrants so issued, and all warrants and complaints upon which bail is taken or commitments are made, shall be immediately returned to the divisions; provided, that the justices of the peace shall not in any case, or for any purpose, have the power to issue search warrants. The justices of the peace may also set and take bail, as provided in this section, and commit and issue warrants (except search warrants), in any division where the defendant is being held by the state police, the metropolitan park police, conservation officers of the department of environmental management, a sheriff or deputy sheriff, the capitol police, the campus security forces of the state colleges and universities, or city or town police forces.

Whenever probable cause exists that a defendant is a violator of bail and/or probation in the district court or superior court, upon being presented with a violation report by the attorney general or the attorney general’s transmission of a violation report to the arresting agency or place of presentment, and upon making a finding that the defendant is subject to violation of bail and/or probation and that probable cause exists on the new charge being brought, the justice of the peace shall issue his or her writ of mittimus confining the defendant without bail and issue a writ of habeas corpus returnable to the next sitting of the district court and make a finding of probable violation in writing. If the attorney general transmits the violation report to the arresting agency or place of presentment, the law enforcement agency shall ensure that the defendant is presented with the violation report and the justice of the peace shall ensure the violation report is attached to his or her writs and other documentation of a district court violation or a superior court violation. The justice of the peace shall proceed to arraign the defendant on the new charge pursuant to subdivision (1). The justice of the peace shall return his or her writs and other documentation of a district court violation to the clerk of the district court; regarding any superior court violation, the attorney for the state shall notify the clerk of the superior court for the county where the case originated, for which a finding of probable violation was made, of the finding of probable violation and the attorney for the state shall, on the same date, request a judge or magistrate of the superior court to issue a writ of habeas corpus for the purpose of a violation presentation before the superior court returnable to the next sitting of the superior court in the county.

In misdemeanor cases, a justice of the peace may accept pleas of not guilty, in which case the justice of the peace may schedule a pre-trial conference date before a judge of the district court.

In non-capital felony cases, the justices of the peace may also schedule felony screening dates.

The fee for the justices of the peace shall be fifty dollars ($50.00), paid by each individual who appears before him or her; provided, that when a special session is requested between the hours of 11:00 p.m. and 8:00 a.m., the fee shall be arranged between the defendant and the justice of the peace, but shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200). Justices of the peace shall have immunity for any actions taken pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 181; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 34; P.L. 1948, ch. 2024, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19; P.L. 1981, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 395, § 1.

12-10-3.
Recording and certification of appointments and revocations — Signature of warrants.

Appointments and revocations shall be recorded in the records of the court and certified by the chief judge making them to the secretary of state, and the judge shall also issue to the justice or justices of the peace his or her warrant under the seal of the court, by which the justice or justices shall be authorized to perform the duties specified in this chapter, and shall also, whenever he or she shall revoke the appointment, notify the justice of the peace in writing of the revocation. Justices of the peace appointed to issue warrants shall sign all warrants by them issued as “Justice of the peace authorized to issue warrants.”

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 182; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19.

12-10-4.
Plea on offense beyond trial jurisdiction of district court.

Whenever any person shall be brought before a district court upon a complaint charging him or her with an offense which is not within the jurisdiction of the court to try and determine, the court may, with the written consent of the attorney general or his or her authorized designee, and with a waiver of indictment or information by such person, acting with the benefit of counsel, receive a plea of guilty or nolo contendere and may impose sentence. There shall be no appeal to the superior court. Any district court judge performing these duties shall receive the same salary as a superior court judge would receive.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 41; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-4

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 18; P.L. 2003, ch. 139, § 1.

12-10-5.
Discharge of person charged with offense beyond trial jurisdiction of district court.

Whenever any person shall be brought before any district court, charged with any offense which it has not jurisdiction to try and determine, and, after hearing all the evidence adduced in relation to it, it shall not appear to the district court that the accused is probably guilty of the offense, or of any other offense substantially charged in the complaint, the accused shall be immediately discharged.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 165; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-5

.

12-10-6.
Recognizance or commitment on charge of offense beyond trial jurisdiction of district court.

Whenever any person shall be brought before the district court upon a complaint charging him or her with an offense which is not within the jurisdiction of the court to try and determine, and it shall appear to the court that the accused is probably guilty, the court shall, if the offense is bailable by it, require the accused to enter into a recognizance in any sum that the court shall direct, with sufficient surety to be approved by the court, with condition that the accused will appear at the superior court for the county in which the division is situated at the time fixed for the attendance of the grand jury in that court which is next after seven (7) days from the day when the recognizance was ordered, and not to depart the superior court without leave, and in the meantime keep the peace and be of good behavior toward all the people of this state. The recognizance shall be immediately certified as soon as may be by the district court to the court before which the accused shall recognize to appear. Whenever the district court shall require any person to enter into a recognizance for his or her appearance before it or before any other court, and shall not give the recognizance, the person shall be immediately committed to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain until he or she is discharged pursuant to law. If the required recognizance is for the appearance of the accused before the superior court, the fact of the commitment shall be immediately certified to the superior court before which the accused has been held to appear.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 166; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19.

12-10-7.
Transmission of papers to superior court.

Whenever a division of the district court, upon a criminal complaint, shall adjudge a defendant in any criminal complaint probably guilty of an offense, the complaint and all papers connected with it shall immediately be certified and be transmitted to the clerk of the superior court for the county in which the division is situated.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 172; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19.

12-10-8.
Discharge of accused on acknowledgment of satisfaction by complainant.

Whenever any person shall be committed to a correctional institution, or shall be under recognizance, to answer to a charge of assault or battery, or both, or for any threat of committing an offense against the person or property of another, if the person injured or threatened shall appear before the judge of the district court who issued the warrant of commitment or took the recognizance, and acknowledge in writing that he or she has received satisfaction of the injury, or has ceased to fear the execution of the threat, the judge may, in his or her discretion, upon payment of all costs that may have accrued, including the board of the prisoner in the institution, if committed, discharge the recognizance, or supersede the commitment, by an order under his or her hand, which order shall be filed with the recognizance, or recorded in the records of the institution, as the case may require. That order shall forever bar all remedy by civil action for the injury.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 173; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 26; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19.

12-10-9.
Adjournment of trial or examination.

The district court may adjourn any trial or examination pending before it, from time to time, not exceeding fourteen (14) days at any one time, except with the consent or at the request of the accused, and to the same or to a different place in the same division.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 167; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 50, § 20; G.L. 1959, §

12-10-9

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 19.

12-10-10.
Commitment or recognizance on adjournment.

In case of an adjournment, if the accused is charged with any offense not bailable by the district court, he or she shall, in the meantime, be committed to the adult correctional institutions; but if bailable, the accused may give recognizance in a sum and with surety or sureties to the satisfaction of the court for his or her appearance for further examination, and for want of recognizance may be committed to the institutions.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 168; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 21; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-10

.

12-10-11.
Default on recognizance.

If the person recognized shall not appear according to the condition of the recognizance, the district court shall record the default and certify the recognizance with the record of the default to the superior court for the same county.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 169; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

12-10-11

.

12-10-12.
Filing of complaints.

Subject to any other provisions of law relative to the filing of complaints for particular crimes, any judge of the district court or superior court may place on file any complaint in a criminal case other than a complaint for the commission of a felony or a complaint against a person who has been convicted of a felony or a private complaint. The court may in its discretion require, as a condition of the filing, the performance of services for the public good or may attach any other conditions to it that the court shall determine; provided, in cases where the court ordered restitution totals less than two hundred dollars ($200) to an injured party pursuant to this section or §

12-19-34

, the court shall require that full restitution be made at the time of sentencing if the court determines that the defendant has the present ability to make the restitution.

Express conditions of any filing in accordance with this section shall be that the defendant at all times during the one year keep the peace and be of good behavior and shall have paid all outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges, and/or any other monetary obligations unless reduced or waived by order of the court. A violation of any condition set by the court may be deemed a violation of the filing and the matter that was filed may be resurrected by the court, or the court may impose a sanction. A determination of whether a violation has occurred shall be made by the court in accordance with the procedures relating to a violation of probation, §§

12-19-9

and

12-19-14

.

In the event the complaint was originally filed under this section subsequent to the defendant’s plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the charges, the court, if it finds there to have been a violation but does not impose a sanction, may sentence the defendant. In the event the court filed the complaint under this section while the defendant maintained a plea of not guilty, if the court finds there to have been a violation but does not impose a sanction, it may proceed to the further disposition of the complaint according to law. If no action is taken on the complaint for a period of one year following the filing, the complaint shall be automatically expunged. No criminal record shall result; provided, that in any civil action for a tort, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilty should be admissible notwithstanding the fact that the complaint has been filed.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, in the event a complaint for a crime involving domestic violence was originally filed under this section subsequent to the defendant’s plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the charges, the court, if it finds there to have been a violation, may sentence the defendant. In the event the court filed the complaint for a crime involving domestic violence under this section while the defendant maintained a plea of not guilty, if the court finds there to have been a violation, it may proceed to the further disposition of the complaint for a crime involving domestic violence according to law. If, for a period of one year after the date of filing, the defendant is not charged with a violation pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the filed complaint for the crime involving domestic violence shall be automatically quashed and shall not be resurrected. If, for a period of three (3) years after the date of filing, the defendant is not charged with a crime involving domestic violence, or if so charged, is acquitted or the complaint is dismissed, all records relating to the filed complaint for a crime involving domestic violence shall be expunged without the requirement of filing a motion pursuant to chapter 1.3 of title 12. No criminal records shall result, unless in any civil action for a tort, in which a plea of guilty or a finding of guilty is admissible notwithstanding the fact that the complaint has been filed. Provided, however, that in sentencing a defendant for a crime involving domestic violence of which the defendant was charged within three (3) years after the filing of a prior crime involving domestic violence to which the defendant pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, the court may take the plea into consideration.

The defendant shall be advised that any and all bail money relating to a case that remains on deposit and is not claimed at the time of expungement shall be escheated to the state’s general treasury in accordance with chapter 12 of title 8.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 97, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 109, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 6; P.L. 2017, ch. 342, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 353, § 3.